New York, session 2025-2026, A7662.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The alcoholic beverage control law is amended by adding a 2 new section 97-e to read as follows: 3 § 97-e. Temporary New York craft beverage permit. The liquor authority 4 is hereby authorized to issue temporary permits to a licensed New York 5 state farm distillery, brewery, winery, cidery or meadery, effective for 6 a period not to exceed twenty-four consecutive hours to authorize the 7 sale of all New York state manufactured liquor, spirits, wine, beer, 8 cider and mead, as authorized to be sold in New York tasting rooms, at 9 outdoor or indoor gatherings, functions, occasions or events located in 10 a municipality with a population of less than one million, within the 11 hours fixed by or pursuant to subdivision five of section one hundred 12 six of this chapter, during which alcoholic beverages may lawfully be 13 sold or served upon premises licensed to sell alcoholic beverages at 14 retail for on-premises consumption in the community in which is located 15 the premises in which such gathering, function, occasion or event is 16 held. The fee for such permit shall be fifty dollars. Permittees shall 17 prominently display their New York state farm distillery, brewery, 18 winery, cidery or meadery permit at the temporarily permitted event for 19 inspection by any regulatory agency. Such permit and the exercise of 20 the privilege granted thereby shall be subject to such rules of the 21 liquor authority as it deems necessary. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00953-01-5